North Carolina, session 2025, HB699.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 153A-103 reads as rewritten:
"§ 153A-103. Number of employees in offices of sheriff and register of deeds.
Subject to the limitations set forth below, the board of commissioners may fix the number of
salaried employees in the offices of the sheriff and the register of deeds. In exercising the
authority granted by this section, the board of commissioners is subject to the following
limitations:
(1) Each sheriff and register of deeds elected by the people has the exclusive right
to hire, discharge, and supervise the employees in his office. However, the his
or her office; provided, however, a sheriff shall not discharge a deputy sheriff
or other employee for failing to make a campaign contribution to the sheriff
or the sheriff's campaign committee. The board of commissioners must
approve the appointment by such an officer of a relative by blood or marriage
of nearer kinship than first cousin or of a person who has been convicted of a
crime involving moral turpitude.
(2) Each sheriff and register of deeds elected by the people is entitled to at least
two deputies who shall be reasonably compensated by the county, provided
that the register of deeds justifies to the Board of County Commissioners the
necessity of the second deputy. Each deputy so appointed shall serve at the
pleasure of the appointing officer.
(3) In addition to the number of salaried employees fixed by the board of
commissioners, each sheriff is entitled to the number of school resource
officers required to satisfy any agreements entered into under
G.S. 162-26.5(b).
Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, approval of the board of
commissioners is not required for the reappointment or continued employment of a near relative
of a sheriff or register of deeds who was not related to the appointing officer at the time of initial
appointment."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H699-v-1*